Utah statutes.
7-2-5.   Appointment of receiver or assignment for creditors -- Notice
required -- Commissioner taking possession.
No receiver may be appointed by any court and no deed or assignment for the
benefit of creditors may be filed in any district court within this state for
any institution or other person under the jurisdiction of the commissioner,
except upon notice to the commissioner, unless because of urgent necessity the
court determines that it is necessary to do so to preserve the assets of the
institution. The commissioner may within five days after service of the notice
upon him take possession of the institution, in which case no further
proceedings shall be had upon the application for the appointment of a
receiver or under the deed of assignment, or, if a receiver has been appointed
or the assignee has entered upon the administration of his trust, the
appointment shall be vacated or the assignee shall be removed upon application
of the commissioner to the court by which the receiver was appointed or in
which the assignment was filed, and the commissioner shall proceed to
administer the assets of the institution as provided in this chapter.
